Washington statutes.
RCW 41.80.300

Uniformed personnel—Higher education—Intent—Purpose.

The intent and purpose of RCW 41.80.310 through 41.80.370 is to recognize that there exists a public policy in the state of Washington against strikes by uniformed personnel as a means of settling their labor disputes; that the uninterrupted and dedicated service of these classes of employees is vital to the welfare and public safety of the state of Washington; and that to promote such dedicated and uninterrupted public service there should exist an effective and adequate alternative means of settling disputes.

[ 2019 c 234 s 3.]